North Dakota statutes. TITLE 62.1 Weapons
CHAPTER 62.1-03 Handguns

62.1-03-01.
Carrying handgun — Limitations — Exceptions.

Unless otherwise prohibited by law, an individual may carry a handgun if the handgun is unloaded and in plain view or secured.

A limitation under subsection 1 does not apply to:

An individual possessing a valid concealed weapons license from this state, an individual not otherwise precluded from possessing a class 2 firearm and dangerous weapon license under chapter 62.1-04 and who has possessed for at least thirty days a valid driver’s license or nondriver identification card issued by the department of transportation, or an individual who has reciprocity under section 62.1-04-03.1.

An individual on that person’s land, or in that individual’s permanent or temporary residence, or fixed place of business.

An individual while lawfully engaged in target shooting.

An individual while in the field engaging in the lawful pursuit of hunting or trapping. However, nothing in this exception authorizes the carrying of a loaded handgun in a motor vehicle.

An individual permitted by law to possess a firearm while carrying the handgun unloaded and in a secure wrapper from the place of purchase to that person’s home or place of business, or to a place of repair or back from those locations.

Any North Dakota law enforcement officer.

Any law enforcement officer of any other state or political subdivision of another state who possesses active law enforcement credentials.

Any armed security guard or investigator as authorized by law when on duty or going to or from duty.

Any member of the armed forces of the United States when on duty or going to or from duty and when carrying the handgun issued to the member.

Any member of the national guard, organized reserves, state defense forces, or state guard organizations, when on duty or going to or from duty and when carrying the handgun issued to the member by the organization.

Any officer or employee of the United States duly authorized to carry a handgun.

An individual engaged in manufacturing, repairing, or dealing in handguns or the agent or representative of that individual possessing, using, or carrying a handgun in the usual or ordinary course of the business.

Any common carrier, but only when carrying the handgun as part of the cargo in the usual cargo carrying portion of the vehicle.

Source:

S.L. 1985, ch. 683, § 5; 1997, ch. 525, § 2; 2013, ch. 491, § 7; 2015, ch. 475, § 6, effective August 1, 2015; 2017, ch. 432, § 1, effective August 1, 2017; 2019, ch. 516, § 11, effective August 1, 2019; 2021, ch. 498, § 2, effective August 1, 2021.

62.1-03-02.
Selling handgun to minors prohibited — Penalty.

Any person who sells, barters, hires, lends, or gives any handgun to any minor is guilty of a class A misdemeanor. This section does not prohibit a person from lending or giving a handgun to a minor if the minor will be using the handgun under the direct supervision of an adult and for the purpose of firearm safety training, target shooting, or hunting.

Source:

S.L. 1985, ch. 683, § 5.

Collateral References.

Liability of one who provides, by sale or otherwise, firearm or ammunition to adult who shoots another, 39 A.L.R.4th 517.

62.1-03-03.
Copy of federal license submitted to law enforcement officials.

A retail dealer licensed to sell handguns by the federal government shall send a copy of the license, within seven days after receiving it, to the chief of police of the city and the sheriff of the county in which the dealer is licensed to sell handguns.

Source:

S.L. 1985, ch. 683, § 5.

Collateral References.

Liability of one who provides, by sale or otherwise, firearm or ammunition to adult who shoots another, 39 A.L.R.4th 517.

Fact that gun was broken, dismantled, or inoperable as affecting criminal responsibility under weapons statute, 81 A.L.R.4th 745.

62.1-03-04.
False information prohibited.

No person, in purchasing or otherwise securing delivery of a handgun or in applying for a license to carry the handgun concealed, may give false information or offer false evidence of the person’s identity.

Source:

S.L. 1985, ch. 683, § 5.

62.1-03-05.
Prohibited alterations on firearms.

A person may not change, alter, remove, or obliterate any mark of identification on a firearm, including the name of the maker, model, or manufacturer’s number or knowingly possess a firearm on which these alterations have been made. Possession of any firearm upon which any identification mark has been changed, altered, removed, or obliterated creates a rebuttable presumption that the possessor made the alterations.

Source:

S.L. 1985, ch. 683, § 5; 2013, ch. 491, § 8.

62.1-03-06.
General penalty.

Any person who violates any provision of this chapter, for which another penalty is not specifically provided, is guilty of a class A misdemeanor.

Source:

S.L. 1985, ch. 683, § 5.